ksw-syllables.ksw.lexd
PATTERNS
(Consonant Medial)[^[W,R,L,G,Y,A]] Vowel Tone
(Consonant Medial)[^[W,R,L,G,Y,A]] Aa

LEXICON Consonant
က[W]
က[R]
က[L]
ခ[W]
ခ[R]
ခ[L]
ဂ[A]
ဃ[W]
င[A]
စ[W]
စ[G]
ဆ[W]
ဆ[G]
ဇ[A]
ည[A]
ပ[R]
ပ[L]
ပ[G]
ပ[Y]
ဖ[R]
ဖ[L]
ဖ[G]
ဖ[Y]
မ[L]
မ[G]
မ[Y]
ဘ[R]
ဘ[L]
ဘ[G]
ဘ[Y]
တ[W]
တ[R]
ထ[R]
ထ[R]
ဒ[W]
ဒ[R]
န[W]
ယ[W]
ရ[W]
ဝ[A]
လ[W]
သ[W]
သ[R]
ဟ[A]
ရှ[A]
အ[A]
ဧ[A]

LEXICON Medial
<w>:ွ[W]
<l>:ျ[L]
<r>:ြ[R]
<y>:ၠ[Y]
<g>:ှ[G]
:

LEXICON Vowel
<i>:ံ
<ei>:့
<ai>:ဲ
<u>:ု
<e>:ၢ
<oo>:ူ
<o>:ိ
<au>:ီ
:

LEXICON Tone
<j>:ၢ်
<z>:ၤ
<f>:ၣ်
<x>:ာ်
<v>:း
:

LEXICON Aa
<aa>:ါ
